North Dakota, session 69, HB1500.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. Section 11-33-17.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and enacted as
follows:
11 - 33 - 17.1. Zoning - Nonconforming structure .
1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or zoning ordinance, a nonconforming structure
devoted to residential use and located in a residential zoning district may be repaired,
replaced, improved, maintained, restored, or rebuilt in its entirety even though the structure is
damaged beyond fifty percent of its value if:
a. An application for a building permit is submitted within six months of the date the damage
occurs;
b. Restoration begins within one year of the date the damage occurred;
c. The lot or parcel upon which the structure dedicated to residential use is located abuts a
public right of way; and
d. The new structure will not:
(1) Occupy a portion of the lot which was not occupied by the damaged structure;
(2) Have more square footage than the damaged structure;
(3) Exceed the height or number of stories of the damaged structure;
(4) Diminish the number of of f - street parking spaces located on the property from the
number of spaces before the damage;
(5) Violate existing building and fire codes;
(6) Violate existing sanitary or health standards imposed by the local health district;
(7) Pose a risk to public health or safety;
(8) Encroach upon a public right of way; or
(9) Encroach upon any neighboring property.
2. Under subsection 1, expansion of a nonconforming structure is prohibited unless the
expansion is in compliance with applicable zoning ordinances and state laws and rules. The
zoning authority shall determine whether a proposed expansion is in compliance.
3. Under subsection 1, a nonconforming structure may not be moved unless the movement or
relocation will bring the structure into compliance with all applicable zoning ordinances.

H. B. NO. 1500 - PAGE 2
4. Notwithstanding subsection 1, the zoning authority shall regulate the repair, replacement ,
improvement, maintenance, restoration, rebuilding, or expansion of nonconforming uses and
structures in floodplain areas to the extent necessary to maintain eligibility in the national flood
insurance program and adhere fully to all applicable floodplain management ordinances
without increasing flood damage potential or increasing the degree of obstruction to floodflows
in the floodway.
5. Notwithstanding subsections 1, 2, and 3, the zoning authority may create a less restrictive
ordinance or regulation.
6. Unless the county determines the repair, replacement, improvement, maintenance,
restoration, rebuilding, of a nonconforming structure will violate subdivision d of subsection 1 ,
the county shall issue a building permit to a property owner that meets the qualifications under
subsection 1 .
7. For purposes of this section, "nonconforming structure" means a structure that was legal
before a change in ordinance made the structure nonconforming.
SECTION 2. Section 40-47-05.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and enacted as
follows:
40 - 47 - 05.1. Zoning - Nonconforming structure .
1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or zoning ordinance, a nonconforming structure
devoted to residential use and located in a residential zoning district may be repaired,
replaced, improved, maintained, restored, or rebuilt in its entirety even though the structure is
damaged beyond fifty percent of its value if:
a. An application for a building permit is submitted within six months of the date the damage
occurs;
b. Restoration begins within one year of the date the damage occurred;
c. The lot or parcel upon which the structure dedicated to residential use is located abuts a
public right of way; and
d. The new structure will not:
(1) Occupy a portion of the lot which was not occupied by the damaged structure;
(2) Have more square footage than the damaged structure;
(3) Exceed the height or number of stories of the damaged structure;
(4) Diminish the number of of f - street parking spaces located on the property from the
number of spaces before the damage;
(5) Violate existing building and fire codes;
(6) Violate existing sanitary or health standards imposed by the local health district;
(7) Pose a risk to public health or safety;
(8) Encroach upon a public right of way; or
(9) Encroach upon any neighboring property.
2. Under subsection 1, expansion of a nonconforming structure is prohibited unless the
expansion is in compliance with applicable zoning ordinances and state laws and rules. The
zoning authority shall determine whether a proposed expansion is in compliance.

H. B. NO. 1500 - PAGE 3
3. Under subsection 1, a nonconforming structure may not be moved unless the movement or
relocation will bring the structure into compliance with all applicable zoning ordinances.
4. Notwithstanding subsection 1, the zoning authority shall regulate the repair, replacement ,
improvement, maintenance, restoration, rebuilding, or expansion of nonconforming uses and
structures in floodplain areas to the extent necessary to maintain eligibility in the national flood
insurance program and adhere fully to all applicable floodplain management ordinances
without increasing flood damage potential or increasing the degree of obstruction to floodflows
in the floodway.
5. Notwithstanding section 40 - 47 - 13 and subsections 1, 2, and 3, the zoning authority may
create a less restrictive ordinance or regulation.
6. Unless the city determines that the repair, replacement, improvement, maintenance,
restoration, rebuilding, of a nonconforming structure will violate subdivision d of subsection 1 ,
the city shall issue a building permit to a property owner that meets the qualifications under
subsection 1 .
7. For purposes of this section, "nonconforming structure" means a structure that was legal
before a change in ordinance made the structure nonconforming.
SECTION 3. Section 58-03-14.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and enacted as
follows:
58 - 03 - 14.1. Zoning - Nonconforming structure .
1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or zoning ordinance, a nonconforming structure
devoted to residential use and located in a residential zoning district may be repaired,
replaced, improved, maintained, restored, or rebuilt in its entirety even though the structure is
damaged beyond fifty percent of its value if:
a. An application for a building permit is submitted within six months of the date the damage
occurs;
b. Restoration begins within one year of the date the damage occurred;
c. The lot or parcel upon which the structure dedicated to residential use is located abuts a
public right of way; and
d. The new structure will not:
(1) Occupy a portion of the lot which was not occupied by the damaged structure;
(2) Have more square footage than the damaged structure;
(3) Exceed the height or number of stories of the damaged structure;
(4) Diminish the number of of f - street parking spaces located on the property from the
number of spaces before the damage;
(5) Violate existing building and fire codes;
(6) Violate existing sanitary or health standards imposed by the local health district;
(7) Pose a risk to public health or safety;
(8) Encroach upon a public right of way; or
(9) Encroach upon any neighboring property.

H. B. NO. 1500 - PAGE 4
2. Under subsection 1, expansion of a nonconforming structure is prohibited unless the
expansion is in compliance with applicable zoning ordinances and state laws and rules. The
zoning authority shall determine whether a proposed expansion is in compliance.
3. Under subsection 1, a nonconforming structure may not be moved unless the movement or
relocation will bring the structure into compliance with all applicable zoning ordinances.
4. Notwithstanding subsection 1, the zoning authority shall regulate the repair, replacement ,
improvement, maintenance, restoration, rebuilding, or expansion of nonconforming uses and
structures in floodplain areas to the extent necessary to maintain eligibility in the national flood
insurance program and adhere fully to all applicable floodplain management ordinances
without increasing flood damage potential or increasing the degree of obstruction to floodflows
in the floodway.
5. Notwithstanding subsections 1, 2, and 3, the zoning authority may create a less restrictive
ordinance or regulation.
6. Unless the township determines that the repair, replacement, improvement, maintenance,
restoration, rebuilding, of a nonconforming structure will violate subdivision d of subsection 1 ,
the township shall issue a building permit to a property owner that meets the qualifications
under subsection 1 .
7. For purposes of this section, "nonconforming structure" means a structure that was legal
before a change in ordinance made the structure nonconforming.

H. B. NO. 1500 - PAGE 5
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1500.
House Vote: Yeas 87 Nays 3 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 31 Nays 16 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State